Massachusetts, session 194th, S2247.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 179
of the Acts of 2022, is hereby amended, in clause (xiv) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by
striking out “, delineated by utility and sector, including residential, residential low-income,
commercial and industrial” and inserting in place thereof the following:-
“; provided, that the data collected pursuant to subclauses (A), (B), and (C) shall be
delineated by utility and sector, including residential, residential low-income, commercial and
industrial, and zip code”
SECTION 2. Said section 21 of said chapter 25 is hereby further amended by inserting at
the end thereof the following:-
of 4

“(g) The administrators of the programs established pursuant to section 19 of this chapter
shall: (i) offer to a customer at no cost a zero-carbon assessment of such customer’s building,
including a heat load calculation, that identifies measures that a customer must take to heat or
cool such building and serve other building energy needs without the use of combustible fuels;
and (ii) identify rebates and incentives available under such programs to assist a customer in
implementing measures identified by such assessment. Measures identified in a zero-carbon
assessment may include, but shall not be limited to, improving building shell insulation; air
sealing; air duct sealing; improving air exchange and indoor air quality; upgrading windows,
doors, and cladding systems; electric wiring and service upgrades; on-site solar generation;
electrical or thermal storage; electric peak load management equipment and software; and
replacing fossil fuel appliances and equipment with electric or otherwise non-combusting
appliances and equipment. A zero-carbon assessment shall include a safety evaluation, including
a combustion safety test of existing fossil fuel appliances, an instrumented test for ambient gas
including for ambient gas from gas leaks at the meter, and a test of existing carbon monoxide
alarms. A customer whose building has undergone such a zero-carbon assessment shall be
provided with a zero-carbon report that identifies for each measure that reduces emissions any
additional benefits including, but not limited to: (i) improvements in comfort, safety, and health,
including indoor air quality; (ii) cost savings; and (iii) any other information the program
administrators determine necessary to include. The Massachusetts energy technology center shall
develop the zero-carbon assessment and the zero-carbon report in consultation with the program
administrators and the energy efficiency advisory council. The commonwealth shall retain rights
to the use of the zero-carbon assessment, the zero-carbon report, and any associated data and
software for use by Mass Save or any successor organization. The zero-carbon assessment shall
of 4

be the standard assessment service available to all customers receiving services provided
pursuant to this section.
(h) The electric distribution companies, municipal aggregators with certified efficiency
plans, and the natural gas distribution companies shall no later than March 31 of each year
provide to the department the data that is collected pursuant to clause (xiv) of paragraph (2) of
subsection (b) of this section during the previous calendar year. The department shall publish
such data on the website of the energy efficiency advisory council no later than April 30 of each
year.
(i) The program administrators shall establish criteria to determine qualifications of
contractors approved to implement recommendations of zero-carbon assessments and reports,
including mitigation and remediation of barriers identified in such zero-carbon assessments and
reports. Contractors approved to implement such recommendations shall agree to: (i) meet
program and industry standards; (ii) warrant their work for at least 12 months after completion;
(iii) undergo quality assurance assessments; and (iv) require their employees and subcontractors
to participate in periodic training programs and to adhere to program goals and standards as
determined by the program administrators. The program administrators shall, whenever feasible,
procure cost savings for customers through purchases in bulk of appliances and other equipment
necessary for implementing zero-caron assessments and reports. The program administrators
shall provide technical assistance to businesses seeking approval under this section that are
women-owned or minority-owned, or that are located in low-income communities or primarily
serve low-income customers.
of 4

(j) The program administrators shall develop: (i) consulting programs to advise building
owners undertaking projects to replace fossil fuel appliances and equipment with electric or
otherwise non-combusting appliances or to upgrade and retrofit buildings as recommended in a
zero-carbon assessment and report; and (ii) training programs for participating staff, contractors,
and volunteers that cover program procedures, costs and benefits of electrification of buildings,
and incentives available for electrification of buildings.
SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect upon its passage and shall apply to energy
efficiency plans beginning with the plan that covers the years 2025 to 2027.
of 4